Massachusetts, session 194th, H4140.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the town of Wellesley may increase the 15-mile
residency limit contained in said section 99A of said chapter 41 for members of the regular
Wellesley police and fire departments. Provided, that any increase in the residency limit shall be
subject to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated in accordance with chapter 150E of the
General Laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effective upon its passage.
of 1